Maine, session 132, LD427.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4364-D is enacted to read:
§4364-D. Minimum parking space requirements; limitations
1. Definition. For purposes of this section, "parking agreement" means a legally
binding agreement between a property developer and the owner of an off-site parking
facility to provide required parking spaces within 0.25 miles of a development site.
2. Limitation of minimum parking space requirements in growth areas. A
municipality may not require more than one off-street parking space per dwelling unit for
a residential development within a designated growth area of a municipality, but a
municipality may impose maximum parking space requirements or require parking demand
management strategies that do not require more than one off-street parking space per
dwelling unit.
3. Legalization of off-site parking agreements. A municipality must allow a
developer to satisfy municipal parking requirements through off-site parking agreements
with existing parking facilities located within 0.25 miles of a development site. A
developer engaged in an off-site parking agreement shall provide to the municipality
documentation demonstrating the availability of sufficient capacity at the off-site parking
facility, as determined by a professional parking study or similar evidence acceptable to
the municipality. A municipality may not impose additional barriers to the approval of
such parking agreements beyond verifying the adequacy of parking supply.
4. Rulemaking. The Maine Office of Community Affairs may adopt rules to
administer and enforce this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR1088(06)